pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de pesca com anzol: Em profundidade; Com mosca; Em água doce; No gelo; Caiaque; Água salgada; Costeira; Outro
zh-TW: 適用垂釣類型: 深海; 飛行; 淡水; 冰; 獨木舟; 鹹水; 海岸; 其他
it: Tipo di pesca ideale: Mare profondo; Volo; Acqua dolce; Ghiaccio; Kayak; Acqua salata; Costa; Altro
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο ψαρέματος: Βαθιά θάλασσα; Μύγα; Γλυκό νερό; Πάγος; Είδος ξύλινης βάρκας; Αλατόνερο; Ακτή; Άλλο
lt-LT: Tinka žvejybos tipui: Giliųjų vandenų; Muselinė; Gėlo vandens; Poledinė; Valtyje; Sūraus vandens; Nuo kranto; Kita
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ rybárčenia: Hlbokomorský; Lietajúci; Sladkovodný; Ľad; Kajak; Morská voda; Pobrežie; Iné
pl: Typ odpowiedni do wędkarstwa: Głębokie morze; Mucha; Woda słodka; Lód; Kajak; Woda słona; Brzeg; Inne
en: Suitable for angling type: Deep sea; Fly; Freshwater; Ice; Kayak; Saltwater; Shore; Other
hu: Horgászattípus: Mélytenger; Repül; Édesvízi; Jég; Kajak; Sósvízi; Part; Egyéb
fr: Convient au type de pêche à la ligne: Mer profonde; Mouche; Eau fraîche; Glace; Kayak; Eau salée; Rive; Autre
sv: Lämplig för metetyp: Djuphav; Fluga; Sötvatten; Is; Kajak; Saltvatten; Strand; Övrigt
ko: 적합한 낚시 유형: 심해; 파리; 담수; 얼음; 카약; 해수; 해안; 기타
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de pescuit cu undiță: La mare adâncime; La muscă; Apă dulce; Gheață; Kayak; Apă sărată; Mal; Altele
tr: Olta Balıkçılığı Tipine Uygun: Açık deniz; Sinek balıkçılığı; Tatlı su; Buzlu su; Kayık; Tuzlu su; Su kıyısı; Diğer
de: Geeignet für diese Angelart: Tiefsee; Fliege; Süßwasser; Eis; Kajak; Salzwasser; Ufer; Sonstiges
nb: Egnet for fisketype: Dypt hav; Flue; Ferskvann; Is; Kajakk; Saltvann; Land; Annet
ru: Для какого типа рыбной ловли: Глубоководье; Муха; Пресноводный; Лед; Каяк; Морская вода; Берег; Другое
ja: 釣りタイプに適している: 深海; フライ; 淡水; アイス; カヤック; 塩水; 海岸; その他
vi: Phù hợp với kiểu câu cá: Câu cá biển sâu; Câu cá bằng ruồi nhân tạo; Nước ngọt; Câu cá dưới băng; Chèo thuyền kayak; Nước mặn; Câu cá ven bờ; Khác
zh-CN: 适用钓鱼类型: 深海; 飞; 淡水; 冰; 皮划艇; 咸水; 海岸; 其他
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto ribolova: Globoko morje; Muharjenje; Sladka voda; Ribolov na ledu; Kajak; Slana voda; Ribolov na obali; Drugo
cs: Vhodný typ rybolovu: Hluboké moře; Muškaření; Sladká voda; Led; Kajak; Slaná voda; Pobřeží; Jiné
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип риболов: Дълбоко море; Муха; Сладка вода; Лед; Каяк; Солена вода; Бряг; Други
da: Velegnet til lystfiskeritype: Dybhav; Flue; Ferskvand; Is; Kajak; Saltvand; Kyst; Andet
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de pesca: Mar profundo; Mosca; Água doce; Gelo; Caiaque; Água salgada; Costa; Outro
es: Adecuado para tipo de pesca con caña: Alta mar; Mosca; Agua dulce; Hielo; Kayak; Agua salada; Orilla; Otros
hr-HR: Vrsta ribolova za koju je prikladno: Dubokomorski; Mušičarenje; Slatkovodni; Na ledu; Kajak; Morski; Obalni; Ostalo
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทการตกปลา: ทะเลน้ำลึก; ฟลาย; น้ำจืด; น้ำแข็ง; เรือคายัค; น้ำเค็ม; ฝั่ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Geschikt voor hengeltype: Diepzee; Vlieg; Zoetwater; IJs; Kajak; Zoutwater; Kust; Andere
fi: Soveltuu ongintatyyppiin: Syvänmeren; Perho; Makeanveden; Jää; Kajakki; Suolaveden; Ranta; Muu